Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-104
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; fees.

There shall be paid to the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, in advance, for services of the secretary of the board by a party demanding or necessitating the service, the following fees: For a copy of any instrument, paper, or record in his or her office, fifteen cents for each one hundred words with a minimum of one dollar and fifty cents; for certificate and seal, one dollar; for filing and recording an assignment, conditional assignment, or sublease agreement, ten dollars; for notice of delinquent account, three dollars; for reinstatement of account, if redemption is made prior to the date when notice of publication is made, five dollars; for copies of maps or plats, three dollars per hour for the time actually required and spent for the copying or preparation thereof.

Laws 1903, c. 104, § 1, p. 574;

R.S.1913, § 2426;

C.S.1922, § 2367;

C.S.1929, § 33-106;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 19, p. 610;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-106;

R.S.1943, § 33-104;

Laws 1957, c. 130, § 1, p. 444;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 3.